Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-405
Definition or legal status of animal;
political subdivision; limitation on power.

No political subdivision may by rule, regulation,
ordinance, resolution, or proclamation define or assign a legal status to
an animal or animals that is in any manner inconsistent with the status of
animals as personal property.

Laws 2012, LB459, § 1.